src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
# The Võro morphophonological/twolc rules file 

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-vro/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

## Special letters
* **u̬** u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **U̬** u plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **ü̬** ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **Ü̬** ü plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **i̬** i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **I̬** i plus U+032C COMBINING CARON BELOW
* **õ̭** õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
* **Õ̭** õ plus U+032D COMBINING CIRCUMFLEX ACCENT BELOW
* **ˋ** U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT other parts of stem
```%{ˋØ%}:0 — U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT used in rules```
**ˋ:0** — U+02CB MODIFIER LETTER GRAVE ACCENT used outside of rules, this is temporary removal 2017-04-20

## Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
```
 %{aä%}:0    — Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä" AÄ1:a AÄ1:ä AÄ1:0
 %{ae%}:a   — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive tahetu
 %{aõ%}:a   — Vowel harmony with "a/e/õ" passive sõidõtu
 %{äe%}:ä    — Vowel harmony with "ä/e/õ" passive
 %{eõ%}:0    — Vowel harmony with "e/õ"
 %{uü%}:0    — Vowel harmony with "u/ü"
 %{öü%}:ö    — Vowel raising
 %{ou%}:o    — Vowel raising
 %{ei%}:e    — Vowel raising
 %{õy%}:õ    — Vowel raising
 %{ao%}:a    — Vowel raising

 %{eØ%}:e    — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{õØ%}:õ    — ütlemä:üt%{eØ%}l  
 %{Øõ%}:0    — juurdlõma:juur%{dØ%}%{0õ%}l

 %{dØ%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dv%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dn%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{dl%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}

 %{ij%}:i    ellä%{ij%}
 %{gv%}:g    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gl%}:g    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gØ%}:g    — HJK and KimmoK ideas argnõma:ar%{gØ%}
 %{uv%}:u    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{üv%}:ü    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{hØ%}:h    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{jØ%}:j    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kØ%}:k    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lØ%}:l    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mØ%}:m    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nØ%}:n    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pØ%}:p    — HJK and KimmoK ideas oppama:o%{pØ%}pama
 %{rØ%}:r    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sØ%}:s    — HJK and KimmoK ideas närväs:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}
 %{vØ%}:v    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{pØ%}:0    — häbü:häbü+N:hä%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}ü
 %{tØ%}:0    — koda:ko%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a
 %{kØ%}:0    — nägo:nä%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}o

 %{bv%}:b    — HJK and KimmoK ideas närväs:när%{bv%}ä%{sØ%}
 %{dr%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas parras:par%{dr%}a%{sØ%}
 %{bm%}:b    — HJK and KimmoK ideas lammas:lam%{bm%}a%{sØ%}
 %{pb%}:p    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pb%}:b    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{tØ%}:t    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{t́Ø%}:t    — HJK and KimmoK ideas jaht́lõma:jah%{t́Ø%}%{eØ%}%{lĺ%}
 %{td%}:t    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{t́d́%}:t́    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kg%}:k    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kaigas:kai%{kg%}as

 %{pbØ%}:p   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pbØ%}:b   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pbØ%}:0   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{pbv%}:p   %{pbv%}:b   %{pbv%}:v   — tõbi: tõvõ tõpõ tõppõ

 %{tdØ%}:d   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{kgØ%}:k   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kgØ%}:g   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kgØ%}:0   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{jiØ%}:i   — HJK and KimmoK ideas vari:var%{jiØ%}o
 %{qmn%}:q   — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{qn%}:q    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na

 %{dd́Ø%}:d   
 %{dd́n%}:d   
 %{dd́r%}:d   
 %{dd́v%}:d   
 %{dd́Ø%}:d   
 %{gǵv%}:g   
 %{gǵØ%}:g   
 %{kḱg%}:k    %{kḱg%}:ḱ    %{kḱg%}:g   
 %{kḱØ%}:k   
 %{pṕb%}:p   %{pṕb%}:ṕ    %{pṕb%}:b   
 %{tt́d%}:t    %{tt́d%}:t́    %{tt́d%}:d   
 %{tt́Ø%}:t    täh%{tt́Ø%}
 %{pṕØ%}:p   

```

## Palatalization of consonants
```
 %{bb́%}:b    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{cć%}:c    — HJK and KimmoK ideas Isaać:Isaa%{cć%}:ci
 %{dd́%}:d    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ff́%}:f    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{gǵ%}:g    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{hh́%}:h    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kḱ%}:k    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lĺ%}:l     — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{lĺ%}:ĺ     — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{mḿ%}:m    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{nń%}:n    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{pṕ%}:p    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{rŕ%}:r    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sś%}:s    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{sś%}:ś    — HJK and KimmoK ideas vaśma:va%{sØ%}%{sś%}
 %{tt́%}:t    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{vv́%}:v    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{ḱǵj%}:ḱ   — HJK and KimmoK ideas laǵa:la%{ḱǵj%}a
 %{zź%}:z    — HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{dd́n%}:d 
```

## Miscellaneous other symbols
```
 %{XV%}:0    — This is used for echoing the previous vowel
 %{XC%}:0    — This is used for lengthening a consonant
 %^I7:0      — This appears in stem vaoma:va%^I7o for vaio
 %^K7:0      — This appears in stem väemä:vä%^K7e for väkeq
 %^V7:0      — This appears in stem häömä:hä%^V7ö for hävvü
 %^T7:0      — This appears in stem kaoma:ka%^T7o for katoq
 %^Y7:õ      — This appears for syna = s%^Y7na and is rendered as õ in the norm
```

## Triggers
```
   %^OO2Õ:0    — joo%^OO2Õ%>i:j0õ0%>i
   %^CC2C:0    — att%^CC2C%>m%{aä%} atma
 %^PSS:0       vowel in passive tahetu, sõidõtu, eletü
 %^ÄI2ÄÄ:0    — päiv%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä: päävä
 %{front%}:0    — front harmony
 %{back%}:0    — back harmony
%^ErrorBack:0  — +Err/Orth+Clt:%>kinaq in front harmony context BHARM disallowance
 %{PrsSg1%}:0  — this helps with %{eõ%}:i̬
```

```

 %{td%}:t 	 HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{kg%}:k 	 HJK and KimmoK ideas kaigas:kai%{kg%}as

 %{qmn%}:q 	 HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{qn%}:q 	 HJK and KimmoK ideas kana:ka%{nØ%}na
 %{XV%}:0		 This is used for echoing the previous vowel
 %{XC%}:0	 This is used for lengthening a consonant
 %^I7:0          This appears in stem vaoma:va%^I7o for vaio
 %^K7:0           This appears in stem väemä:vä%^K7e for väkeq
 %^V7:0          This appears in stem häömä:hä%^V7ö for hävvü
 %^T7:0          This appears in stem kaoma:ka%^T7o for katoq

**%^Y7:õ  **  This appears for syna = s%^Y7na and is rendered as õ in the norm
```

```
%^NoGrad:0     — This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation
%^APOCH:0      — This causes apochope: puhksama vs puhastaq
%^StrD2T:0     — This changes g,d,b => k,t,p

%^G1:0	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 0, also t, k
%^G2:0	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 b, also t, k
%^G3:0	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for 0 p, also t, k
%^G4:0	       — This is used with %{pØ%} %{pbØ%} for p p, also t, k

%^WGStem:0     — This weakens "kipõń" to "kibõna", "ompel" to "ommel"
%^StrGStem:0   — This strengthens "perädü" to "perätüt"
%^ShortGStem:0   — This shortens "pu%{tØ%}tu" to "putma", an orthographic convension
%^LongGStem:0     — This lengthens "pu%{tØ%}tu" to "puttuq"

%^Pen:0        — This moves us to penultimate coda
%^PAL:0	       — Palatalization
%^NoPAL:0	       — NoPalatalization

%^JI20:0	       — in vari: vaŕo
%^JI2I:0	       — in vari vari
%^JI2J:0	       — in vari: varjo

%^PenWGStem:0  — This weakens "kipõń" to "kibõna"
%^PenVowRM:0   — syncope tapõld : taplõma 
%^D2S:0        — The ti => si
%^TS2S:0       — The -ts- => -s-
%^I2J:0        — The i => j change
%^PLPRT:0      — The a:o attested in Plural kana:kanno and prt
%^VOWRaise:0   — Raises vowel
%^VOWLower:0   — Lowers vowel
%^XLowerVow:0  — Lowers vowel two levels
%^VOWLowerDelab:0   — Lowers vowel and delabializes it
%^XLowerVowDelab:0  — Lowers vowel two levels and delabializes it
%^U2E:0        — lowers u:õ and ü:e delabializes and lowers
%^U2A:0        — lowers u:a and ü:ä delabializes and lowers
%^VowRM:0      — this will remove stem final vowel
%^CnsRM:0      — this will remove stem final consonant tervüs:tervü
```

Onset consonant or word boundary

* *füüsi{kg}a{back}^Pen^StrGStem^VowRM>i>dõ*
* *füüsik00000>i>dõ*

Right context for gradation

# Rules

## VOWEL HARMONY 
### Vowel harmony suffixes Front
**%{aä%}:a**

**%{aä%}:ä**

**%{uü%}:u**

**%{uü%}:ü**

**%{eõ%}:õ**

**%{eõ%}:e**

**%{ae%}:e**
tahtma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: **want/haluta**
* *tah{tt́Ø}{ae}{back}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem>{eõ}>t{uü}*
* *tah0e00000>0>tu*

**%{aõ%}:õ**

**%{äe%}:e**

### VOWEL LOWERING

**u:o**
* *lugõ%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i*
* *lo00000000%>i*

**ü:ö**
* *pü{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem^VowRM>e>t*
* *pö00000000>e>t*
* *süü%{front%}%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>nüq*
* *söö000%>nüq*

**o2õ**
* *joo%{back%}%^OO2Õ%>i*
* *jõ000%>i*
* *aigo%{back%}%^OO2Õ*
* *aigõ00*

**u2õ**
* *laulu%{back%}%^OO2Õ*
* *laulõ00*

**ö2e**
* *söö%{front%}%^OO2Õ%>i*
* *se000%>i*

**Delabializing o and ö**

### VOWEL RAISING
**Delabializing o and ö**

### PALATALIZATION
**n2ń palatalization all**
kestmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
* *kes{tt́}{äe}{front}^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *kest́00000*

akaŕ+A+Sg+Nom
* *a%{kg%}a%{rŕ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^G2%^PAL*
* *akaŕ0000*

asi+N+Sg+Gen:
* *a%{sś%}%{jiØ%}%{back%}%^PAL%^VowRM%>%{aä%}*
* *aś0000%>a*

alostama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
* *alos{tt́}a^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *alost́000000*

**%{kḱ%}:ḱ**
kakma
* *ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u%{back%}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^G4^Pen^PAL%^VowRM*
* *kakḱ000000000*
* *ka{kØ}{kḱ}u{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^G3^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>n{uü}q*
* *ka0k000000000>nuq*

**n2n no palatalization all**

rehksämä+V+Inf/mA:
* *reh{kØ}ä{sś}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}*
* *rehk0s000000>ä>mä*
hanǵ+N+Sg+Gen: **snow pack/hanki**
* *han{gǵ}{back}^NoPAL>%{eõ%}*
* *hang000>e*

**{dd́n}:d́ palatalization for 3-way**

särǵ+N+Sg+Nom: **roach/särki**
* *sär{gǵØ}{front}^StrGStem^PAL*
* *särǵ000*
andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
* *an%{dd́n%}%{back%}%^PAL*
* *and́00*

**{dd́n}:n weaken 3-way**

andma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
* *an%{dd́n%}%{back%}%^WGStem%>m%{aä%}*
* *ann00%>ma*

püüdmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
* *pü%{üv%}%{dd́v%}%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{aä%}*
* *püvv00%>ä*

**%{dd́v%}:v**

**%{pṕb%}:p**
loroṕ+N+Sg+Par:
* *loro{pṕb}{back}^StrGStem^NoPAL>i*
* *lorop000>i*

**%{tt́d%}:t**

hainatama+V+Inf/mA
* *haina{tt́d}a{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem>m{aä}*
* *hainata00000>ma*

**%{kḱg%}:k**
* *pisla%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^G2%>*
* *pislaḱ00%>*

**%{pṕb%}:ṕ**
loroṕ
* *loro{pṕb}{back}^StrGStem^PAL*
* *loroṕ000*

**%{tt́d%}:t́**

**%{kḱg%}:ḱ**
* *pisla%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^StrGStem%^PAL*
* *pislaḱ000*

kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Nom
* *kõ̭i%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL*
* *kõ̭i0ḱ000*

### VOWEL CHANGE WITH PLURAL

tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: **do**
* *teg%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{eõ%}*
* *ti̬000%>i̬*

* *k%{ei%}%{ei%}%{lĺ%}%{front%}%^VOWRaise%^PAL*
* *ki̬i̬ĺ000*

**õ2õ̭**
* *sõda%{back%}%^WGStem*
* *sõ̭0a00*

**o2u̬**

**Vx%{ou%}:Vyo**

hoolas+A+Sg+Nom:
* *h%{ou%}%{ou%}la%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^G1*
* *hoolas00000*
Toomas+N+Prop+Sg+Nom
* *T{ou}{ou}ma{sØ}{back}^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem^StrGStem*
* *Toomas000000*

**Vx%{ou%}2Vyu̬**
nuuĺ+N+Sg+Nom: **arrow**
* *n%{ou%}%{ou%}%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^VOWRaise%^PAL*
* *nu̬u̬ĺ000*
juuma+V+Pss+Cond+ConNegI: **drink/juoda**
* *j{ou}{ou}{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM>vv{aä}>siq*
* *ju̬0000>vva>siq*

kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: **tongue/kieli**
* *k%{ei%}%{ei%}{lĺ}%{front%}%^VOWRaise%^PAL*
* *ki̬i̬ĺ000*
* *k%{ei%}%{ei%}r%{dØ%}%{eØ%}%{lĺ%}%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^VowRM%>%{eõ%}%>m%{aä%}*
* *ki̬i̬rd0l00000%>e%>mä*
